Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Sale of Burglar Bars

§ 45-11-71.
Sellers of burglar bars to public to comply with standard building code.

In the interest of public safety, any person who engages in the sale of burglar bars to the public shall comply with 1105.7 of the Standard Building Code of the Southern Building Code Congress International, as revised.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 579, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 45-11-73.
State fire marshal to promulgate rules and regulations; exceptions.

The State Fire Marshal shall promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the provisions of Sections 45-11-71 through 45-11-75. These rules and regulations shall apply except in any county or municipality which has adopted the Standard Building Code of the Southern Building Code Congress International, with standards not less stringent than the Mississippi Fire Prevention Code.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 579, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 45-11-75.
Penalty for violation.

Any person violating the provisions of Section 45-11-71, upon conviction, shall be fined in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), and in the case of continuing violations without reasonable effort on the part of the defendant to correct such violations, each day of violation thereafter shall be a separate offense.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 579, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1993.